Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska34-117
Lawful fences; Warner's Patent; requirements.

Fence known as Warner's Patent shall be at least four and one-half feet in height, and consist of not less than five boards; such boards to be of a width of not less than five inches, and one inch thick.

Laws 1867 (Ter.), § 3, p. 18;

R.S.1913, § 2495;

C.S.1929, § 34-117;

R.S.1943, § 34-117.

This section was not intended to apply to railroads. Chicago, B. & Q. R. R. Co. v. James, 26 Neb. 188, 41 N.W. 992 (1889).